GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-func.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     function words (pronouns, prepositiions, conjunctions, ...)
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	14-May-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================

Multichar_Symbols
+Adj		! adjective
+Adv 		! adverb
+Art 		! article
+Conj 		! conjunction
+Det		! determiner
+PreDet		! predeteminer
+Prep		! preposition
+Pron		! pronoun
+Postmod
+Premod

+Quant +QuantPron	! quantifier	

+Coord		! coordinating (conjunction)
+Subord  	! subordinating (conjunction)
+Inf		! infinitival (conjunction)

+AConj		! Adverb that may occur as conjunctions

+Def +Indef +Dem 
+Rel +Interrog +Ne
+Pers +Poss +Refl
+Ton +Aton +Preclit
+Date

+Sg +Pl	+SP		! number
+Masc +Fem +MF		! gender
+1P +2P +3P		! person
+Nom +Acc +Dat		! case


+Elided +Apoc +Euph

! special symbols
^=		! token boundary in contracted forms
^]		! lemma boundary (for regular inflection)

!# ========================================================================
LEXICON PREP-A		
a+Prep			#;
a+Prep+Euph:ad		#;

LEXICON PREP-AL
PREP-A;
a+Prep^=:a		ARTICLE;

LEXICON PREP-DA
da+Prep			#;

LEXICON PREP-DAL
PREP-DA;
da+Prep^=:da		ARTICLE ;

LEXICON PREP-DI
di+Prep			ELID;
di+Prep+Apoc:de		#;


LEXICON PREP-DEL
PREP-DI;
di+Prep^=:de		ARTICLE ;

LEXICON WITH-DI		< %  >	PREP-DI;

LEXICON WITH-AL		< %  >	PREP-AL;
LEXICON WITH-DAL	< %  >	PREP-DAL;
LEXICON WITH-DEL	< %  >	PREP-DEL;
LEXICON WITH-DALDEL	WITH-DAL; WITH-DEL;

LEXICON ARTICLE
lo+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:llo		ELID;
lo+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:lla		ELID;
lo+Art+Def+Masc+Pl:gli		ELID;
lo+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:lle		#;		! ELID

il+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:l		#;	! al, dal, del
il+Art+Def+Masc+Pl:i		#;	! ai, dai, dei
il+Art+Def+Masc+Pl+Apoc:%'	#;	! a', da', de'

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON GLI-PRON	! preceeded by "glie-"
ne+Pron+Ne+MF+SP:ne				#;
lui+Pron+Pers+Acc+Aton+3P+Masc+Sg:lo		ELID;
lui+Pron+Pers+Acc+Aton+3P+Fem+Sg:la		ELID;
loro+Pron+Pers+Acc+Aton+3P+Masc+Pl:li		#;
loro+Pron+Pers+Acc+Aton+3P+Fem+Pl:le		#;

!# -------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation class for (optional) elision of final vowel
!# e.g.  di --> di or d'

LEXICON ELID
  	#;  
+Elided	#;


!# general continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;
LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

LEXICON ROOT
lo+Art+Def+Masc+Pl:gli		ELID;
lo+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:la		ELID;
lo+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:lo		ELID;
uno+Art+Indef+Fem+Sg:una		ELID;
codesto+Det+Dem+Masc+Sg:codesto		ELID;	!?
codesto+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:codesta		ELID;	!?
quello+Det+Dem+Masc+Sg:quello		ELID;
quello+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:quella		ELID;
quello+Det+Dem+Masc+Pl:quegli		ELID;	
questo+Det+Dem+Masc+Sg:questo		ELID;
questo+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg:questa		ELID;
tutto+PreDet+Fem+Pl:tutte		ELID;
tutto+PreDet+Masc+Pl:tutti		ELID;
tutto+PreDet+Fem+Sg:tutta		ELID;
tutto+PreDet+Masc+Sg:tutto		ELID;
entrambi+PreDet+Fem+Pl:entrambe		ELID;
entrambi+PreDet+Masc+Pl:entrambi	ELID;
anche+Conj+Coord		ELID;	!also Adv, but in a litteral register
come+Conj+Subord		ELID;	!BOTH Conj and Adv 
dove+Conj+Subord		ELID;	!BOTH Conj and Adv 
piuttosto% che+Conj+Subord	ELID;
pure+Conj+Subord		ELID;	
a% condizione% che+Conj+Subord	ELID;	!with subjunctive
a% meno% che+Conj+Subord	ELID;	!with subjunctive
a% patto% che+Conj+Subord	ELID;	!with subjunctive
allorché+Conj+Subord		ELID;
altrimenti% che+Conj+Subord	ELID;
ammesso% che+Conj+Subord	ELID;	!? loc.cong. ipotizzato che: a. che arrivi entro cinque minuti, non riusciremo comunque a fare in tempo
anche% se+Conj+Subord		ELID;
che+Conj+Subord			ELID;	
così% che+Conj+Subord		ELID;
dal% momento% che+Conj+Subord	ELID;
fintanto% che+Conj+Subord	ELID;
fuorché+Conj+Subord		ELID;
giacché+Conj+Subord		ELID;
in% modo% che+Conj+Subord	ELID;
intanto% che+Conj+Subord	ELID;
piuttosto% che+Conj+Subord	ELID;
prima% che+Conj+Subord		ELID;
se+Conj+Subord			ELID;	
secondo% che+Conj+Subord	ELID;
sempre% che+Conj+Subord		ELID;
sempreché+Conj+Subord		ELID;
sennonché+Conj+Subord		ELID;
senonché+Conj+Subord		ELID;
senza% che+Conj+Subord		ELID;
solo% che+Conj+Subord		ELID;
tranne% che+Conj+Subord		ELID;
visto% che+Conj+Subord		ELID;
a% cagione		WITH-DEL;
a% causa		WITH-DEL;
a% favore		WITH-DEL;
a% meno			WITH-DEL;
a% proposito		WITH-DEL;
a% scapito		WITH-DEL;
accanto			WITH-AL;
al% di% fuori		WITH-DALDEL;
al% di% là		WITH-DALDEL;
al% di% qua		WITH-DALDEL;
al% di% sopra		WITH-DEL;
al% di% sotto		WITH-DEL;
all'infuori		WITH-DI;
assieme			WITH-AL;
attorno			WITH-AL;
attraverso		WITH-DI;
avanti			WITH-AL;
con+Prep^=:co		ARTICLE;	! collo, colla, colli, colle, col, coi, ?ne'
contro			WITH-AL;
davanti			WITH-AL;
dentro			WITH-AL;
di% fronte		WITH-AL;
dietro			WITH-AL;
dinanzi			WITH-AL;
discosto		WITH-DAL;
dopo			WITH-DI;
fino			WITH-AL;
fuori			WITH-DI;
grazie			WITH-AL;
in% luogo		WITH-DEL;
in% proporzione		WITH-AL;
in% rapporto		WITH-AL;
in% relazione		WITH-AL;
in+Prep^=:ne		ARTICLE;	! nello, nella, nelli, nelle, nel, nei, ?ne'
innanzi			WITH-AL;
intorno			WITH-AL;
invece			WITH-DEL;
lontano 		WITH-DAL;
lungi 			WITH-DAL;
per% interesse		WITH-DEL;
per% mezzo		WITH-DEL;
presso			WITH-DI;
prima			WITH-DEL;
quanto	        	WITH-AL;
riguardo		WITH-DI;	!? was: prePrep
rispetto		WITH-DI;	!? was: prePrep
rispetto		WITH-AL;
senza+Prep		ELID;		! senza, senz'
sopra			WITH-DI;
sotto			WITH-DI;
sotto+Prep		ELID;		! sotto, sott'
su			WITH-DI;
su+Prep^=:su		ARTICLE;	! sullo, sulla, sulli, sulle, sul, sui, ?su' 
vicino			WITH-DI;	!? was: prePrep
io+Pron+Pers+Acc+Aton+1P+MF+Sg:mi		ELID;
io+Pron+Pers+Dat+Aton+1P+MF+Sg:mi		ELID;
tu+Pron+Pers+Acc+Aton+2P+MF+Sg:ti		ELID;
tu+Pron+Pers+Dat+Aton+2P+MF+Sg:ti		ELID;
lui+Pron+Pers+Acc+Aton+3P+Masc+Sg:lo		ELID;
lui+Pron+Pers+Acc+Aton+3P+Fem+Sg:la		ELID;
lui+Pron+Pers+Dat+Aton+3P+MF+Sg^=:glie		GLI-PRON;	! glielo, etc.
noi+Pron+Pers+Acc+Aton+1P+MF+Pl:ci		ELID;
noi+Pron+Pers+Dat+Aton+1P+MF+Pl:ci		ELID;
voi+Pron+Pers+Acc+Aton+2P+MF+Pl:vi		ELID;
voi+Pron+Pers+Dat+Aton+2P+MF+Pl:vi		ELID;
si+Pron+Refl+Aton+3P+MF+SP:si			ELID;
codesto^]+Pron+Dem				MFSGPL;
cotesto^]+Pron+Dem				MFSGPL;
medesimo^]+Pron+Dem				MFSGPL;
quello^]+Pron+Dem				MFSGPL;
questo^]+Pron+Dem				MFSGPL;
stesso^]+Pron+Dem				MFSGPL;
che+Pron+Rel+MF+SP:che				ELID;
qualcheduno+Pron+Indef+Fem+Sg:qualcheduna	ELID;
qualcosa+Pron+Indef+Masc+Sg:qualcosa		ELID;
qualcuno+Pron+Indef+Fem+Sg:qualcuna		ELID;
cosa+Pron+Interrog+MF+Sg:cosa			ELID;
ne+Pron+Ne+MF+SP:ne				ELID;
quanto+QuantPron+Fem+Pl:quante			ELID;
quanto+QuantPron+Fem+Sg:quanta			ELID;
quanto+QuantPron+Masc+Pl:quanti			ELID;
quanto+QuantPron+Masc+Sg:quanto			ELID;
tutto+Adv					ELID;	!? tutt'altro YES
ci+Adv						ELID;
vi+Adv						ELID;
